Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 239,899
(2) Extraordinary expenses ............ $ 18,991
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate March 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 1